Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.467

Stay.

A party may submit to the presiding or reviewing officer, as is appropriate to the stage of the proceeding, a petition for stay of effectiveness of a final order within ten days of its service unless otherwise provided by statute or stated in the final order. Disposition of the petition for stay shall be made by the presiding officer, reviewing officer, or agency head as provided by agency rule. Disposition may be made either before or after the effective date of the final order. Disposition denying a stay is not subject to judicial review.

[ 1988 c 288 s 420.]